el: Στυλ πλέγματος υποστρώματος κοπής: Ενδείξεις γωνίας/μοιρών; Κυκλικοί οδηγοί/οδηγοί ακτίνας; Ισομετρικό πλέγμα; Χωρίς τυπωμένους οδηγούς; Γραμμές λοξής κοπής για καπιτονέ; Τυπικό τετράγωνο πλέγμα; Άλλο
th: แผ่นรองตัดแบบ Grid: เส้นบอกมุม/องศา; เส้นบอกวงกลม/รัศมี; กริดไอโซเมตริก; ไม่มีเส้นไกด์บนแผ่น; เส้นบอกแนวผ้าควิลท์; กริดสี่เหลี่ยมมาตรฐาน; อื่นๆ
ko: 커팅 매트 격자 무늬: 각도/도 표시; 원형/반경 가이드; 등각 투영 그리드; 인쇄된 가이드 없음; 퀼팅 바이어스 선; 표준 정사각형 그리드; 기타
zh-CN: 切割垫网格样式: 角度/度数标记; 圆形/半径辅助线; 等轴测网格; 无印刷辅助线; 绗缝斜纹辅助线; 标准方形网格; 其他
tr: Kesme matı ızgara stili: Açı/derece işaretleri; Dairesel/yarıçap kılavuzları; İzometrik ızgara; Baskılı kılavuz yok; Kapitone verev çizgileri; Standart kare ızgara; Diğer
pt-PT: Tapete de corte em formato Grid: Marcações de ângulos/graus; Guias circulares/de raio; Grelha isométrica; Sem guias impressas; Linhas de viés para acolchoamento; Grelha quadrada padrão; Outra
bg-BG: Стил на решетката (грид) на режещата подложка: Маркировки за ъгъл/градус; Водачи за кръг/радиус; Изометрична мрежа; Без отпечатани водачи; Линии за диагонално рязане (куилтинг); Стандартна квадратна мрежа; Други
fi: Leikkausmaton ruudukkotyyppi: Kulma-/astemerkinnät; Ympyrä-/sädeohjaimet; Isometrinen ruudukko; Ei painettuja ohjaimia; Tilkkutyön vinoviivat; Vakio neliöruudukko; Muu
ru: Стиль сетки коврика для раскроя: Угловая разметка / в градусах; Круговые/радиусные направляющие; Изометрическая сетка; Без разметки; Косые линии для квилтинга; Стандартная квадратная сетка; Другое
da: Skæremåttens gitterstil: Vinkel-/gradmarkeringer; Cirkel-/radiusguider; Isometrisk gitter; Ingen trykte guider; Quilte-skrålinjer; Standard firkantet gitter; Andet
en: Cutting mat grid style: Angle/degree markings; Circular/radius guides; Isometric grid; No printed guides; Quilting bias lines; Standard square grid; Other
pt-BR: Estilo de grade da base de corte: Marcações de ângulo/grau; Guias circulares/de raio; Grade isométrica; Sem guias impressas; Linhas de viés para quilting; Grade quadrada padrão; Outros
it: Tappetino da taglio Grid: Indicatori di angoli/gradi; Guide circolari/per raggi; Griglia isometrica; Nessuna guida stampata; Linee di sbieco per quilting; Griglia quadrata standard; Altro
vi: Kiểu lưới thảm cắt: Vạch chia góc/độ; Đường dẫn tròn/bán kính; Lưới đẳng cự; Không in đường dẫn; Đường chéo chần bông; Lưới vuông tiêu chuẩn; Khác
de: Rasterstil der Schneidematte: Winkel-/Gradmarkierungen; Kreis-/Radiusführungen; Isometrisches Raster; Keine gedruckten Führungen; Quilting-Schräglinien; Standard-Quadratraster; Sonstige
hu: Vágóalátét rácsozásának stílusa: Szög-/fokjelölések; Kör-/sugárvezetők; Izometrikus rács; Nyomtatott vezetők nélkül; Átlós vonalak foltvarráshoz; Szabványos négyzetrács; Egyéb
fr: Style de grille du tapis de découpe: Repères d’angle/degré; Guides circulaires/de rayon; Grille isométrique; Aucun guide imprimé; Lignes de biais pour matelassage; Grille carrée standard; Autre
lt-LT: Pjovimo kilimėlio tinklelio tipas: Kampių / laipsnių žymos; Apskritimų / spindulių kreiptuvai; Izometrinis tinklelis; Be atspausdintų kreiptuvų; Daigstymo įstrižainės; Standartinis kvadratinis tinklelis; Kita
es: Estilo de cuadrícula de la esterilla de corte: Marcas de ángulo/grados; Guías circulares/de radio; Cuadrícula isométrica; Sin guías impresas; Líneas de sesgo para acolchado; Cuadrícula cuadrada estándar; Otro
ja: カッティングマットGridスタイル: 角度マーク; 円 / 半径ガイド; 等角グリッド; ガイドなし; キルティングバイアスライン; 標準方眼グリッド; その他
sv: Skärmatta Grid: Vinkel-/gradmarkeringar; Cirkel-/radiemarkeringar; Isometriskt rutnät; Inga tryckta markeringar; Diagonala linjer för quiltning; Standard kvadratiskt rutnät; Annat
sl-SI: Slog mreže rezalne podloge: Oznake za kote/stopinje; Krožna/radialna vodila; Izometrična mreža; Brez natisnjenih vodil; Linije za krpanke (bias); Standardna kvadratna mreža; Drugo
sk-SK: Mriežkový vzor rezacej podložky: Značky uhlov/stupňov; Kruhové/polomerové vodidlá; Izometrická mriežka; Bez vytlačených vodidiel; Vodiace čiary na prešívanie; Štandardná štvorcová mriežka; Iné
pl: Styl siatki maty do cięcia: Znaczniki kątów / stopni; Prowadnice okręgów / promieni; Siatka izometryczna; Brak wydrukowanych prowadnic; Linie skosu do pikowania; Standardowa siatka kwadratowa; Inny
zh-TW: 切割墊格線樣式: 角度/度數標記; 圓形/半徑指南; 等距網格; 無印刷指南; 拼布斜線; 標準方形網格; 其他
nl: Snijmat rasterstijl: Hoek-/gradenmarkeringen; Cirkel-/radiusgeleiders; Isometrisch grid; Geen geprinte geleiders; Quilt-biaslijnen; Standaard vierkant grid; Overig
cs: Typ mřížky řezací podložky: Značení úhlů/stupňů; Kruhová/poloměrová vodítka; Izometrická mřížka; Bez tištěných vodítek; Šikmé čáry pro patchwork; Standardní čtvercová mřížka; Jiné
hr-HR: Stil mreže podloge za rezanje: Oznake kutova/stupnjeva; Kružne oznake / oznake polumjera; Izometrijska mreža; Bez ispisanih oznaka; Linije za prošivanje pod kutom; Standardna kvadratna mreža; Ostalo
ro-RO: Stil grilă caroiaj de tăiere: Marcaje pentru unghi/grade; Ghidaje circulare/pentru rază; Grilă izometrică; Fără ghidaje imprimate; Linii oblice pentru quilting; Grilă pătrată standard; Altele
nb: Skjærematteramme: Vinkel-/gradmarkeringer; Sirkel-/radiusguider; Isometrisk rutenett; Ingen trykte guider; Skråbåndslinjer for quilting; Standard kvadratisk rutenett; Annet